Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1949.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Federal Grant Requirements Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth agency." An executive agency, an independent agency or a State-affiliated agency."Government agency." Any of the following:(1) A Commonwealth agency, transportation authority or agency created by statute.(2) A political subdivision or municipal or other local authority or an agency of a political subdivision or 123456789101112131415161718 municipal or other local authority."Political subdivision." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, school district, career and technical school district and county institution district.Section 3. Federal grants.(a) Contract language.--A grant contract entered into by a government agency which is funded, in whole or in part, by Federal funds, including pass-through funds, shall include the following language:This award is funded, in whole or in part, by Federal funds. Therefore, all applicable Federal grant guidelines, including, but not limited to, 2 CFR 200 and the special conditions listed on the government agency's Federal award(s), are applicable to this award.(b) Procurement guidelines.--A grant recipient shall follow Federal procurement guidelines as identified in 2 CFR 200.320 (relating to procurement methods).Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1949PN2458 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819